District of Columbia statutes.
16-1111

Separate action for rent or damages.

The plaintiff in ejectment is not required to join his claim for rent or damages with his claim for the recovery of the land and his omission to do so does not prevent him from bringing his action for rent or damages separately.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 566, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
1981 Ed., § 16-1111.
1973 Ed., § 16-1111.